New York, session 2025-2026, S3115.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property tax law is amended by adding a new 2 section 475 to read as follows: 3 § 475. Airport improvements. Upon the enactment of a local law or 4 resolution by the governing body of a city or town, subject to permis- 5 sive referendum, improvements on or to the landing area of a privately- 6 owned airport which grants free use of its landing area to the public 7 for takeoff and landing of aircraft and which is listed in the United 8 States government flight information publication airport/facility direc- 9 tory as being open to the public shall be exempt from taxation to the 10 extent provided for in such resolution. For the purposes of this 11 section landing area means the surfaces of an airport encompassed within 12 the principal boundaries that are maintained and available for takeoff, 13 landing, taxiing, and open air parking of an aircraft using said 14 airport, any air navigation or communications facility associated with 15 the airport and any passenger terminal building available for public use 16 without charge. No exemption shall be granted on land areas used for 17 crop production or other portions of the airport complex from which 18 income is derived. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 20 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07236-01-5